dev/proper-noun/proper-noun.bn.dix
<?xml version="1.0" ?>
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="ই__enclitic">
      <!-- passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ই</l>
          <r><j/>ই<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ও__enclitic">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            ও
            <s n="adv"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="আরব__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ই</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            েও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="loc"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ের
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ে
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="loc"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            েরও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            েরই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="চৌধুরী__np_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কেও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            র
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কেই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কে
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            রও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            রই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="আরব">
      <i>
        আরব
      </i>
      <par n="আরব__np_mf"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="চৌধুরী">
      <i>
        চৌধুরী
      </i>
      <par n="চৌধুরী__np_m"/>
    </e>
